Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2736
Bonds; tax exempt.

All bonds of a city issued pursuant to sections 18-2724 to 18-2736 are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempt from all taxes.

Laws 1993, LB 732, § 13.